Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.550

Death of individual subject to conservatorship.

(1) Upon the death of an individual subject to conservatorship, a conservator shall:

(a) Have authority to disburse or commit those funds under the control of the conservator as are prudent and within the means of the estate for the disposition of the deceased individual subject to conservatorship's remains. Consent for such arrangement must be secured according to RCW 68.50.160. If no person authorized by RCW 68.50.160 accepts responsibility for giving consent, the conservator may consent, subject to the provisions of this section and to the known directives of the deceased individual subject to conservatorship. Reasonable financial commitments made by a conservator pursuant to this section are binding against the estate of the deceased individual subject to conservatorship;

(b) Deliver to the court for safekeeping any will of the individual in the conservator's possession and inform the personal representative named in the will if feasible, or if not feasible, a beneficiary named in the will, of the delivery.

(2) If forty days after the death of an individual subject to conservatorship no personal representative has been appointed and no application or petition for appointment is before the court, the conservator may apply to exercise the powers and duties of a personal representative to administer and distribute the decedent's estate. The conservator shall give notice of his or her appointment and the pendency of any probate proceedings as provided in RCW 11.28.237 and shall also give notice to a person nominated as personal representative by a will of the decedent of which the conservator is aware. The court may grant the application if there is no objection and endorse the letters of office to note that the individual formerly subject to conservatorship is deceased and the conservator has acquired the powers and duties of a personal representative.

(3) On the death of an individual subject to conservatorship, the conservator shall conclude the administration of the conservatorship estate as provided in RCW 11.130.570.

[ 2020 c 312 s 223; 2019 c 437 s 427.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.